Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2426
Misrepresentation; liability.

(1) A client shall not be liable for a misrepresentation of his or her limited agent arising out of the limited-agency agreement unless the client knew or should have known of the misrepresentation.

(2) A licensee who is serving as a limited agent or subagent of a client shall not be liable for a misrepresentation of his or her client arising out of the brokerage-services agreement unless the licensee knew or should have known of the misrepresentation.

(3) A licensee who is serving as a limited agent of a client shall not be liable for a misrepresentation of any subagent unless the licensee knew or should have known of the misrepresentation.

(4) A licensee who is serving as a subagent shall not be liable for a misrepresentation of the primary limited agent unless the subagent knew or should have known of the misrepresentation.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 26;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 9.